Hawaii statutes.
[§339D-10]
Electronic device recycling fund. (a) There is established in the state
treasury the electronic device recycling fund into which shall be deposited all
fees, payments, and penalties collected by the department pursuant to this
chapter.

(b) The electronic device recycling fund shall
be administered by the department of health. Moneys in the fund shall be
expended by the director solely for the purpose of implementing and enforcing
this chapter. [L Sp 2008, c 13, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next